New York, session 2025-2026, S3835.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The private housing finance law is amended by adding a new 2 article 20-A to read as follows: 3 ARTICLE XX-A 4 MANUFACTURED HOME COMMUNITY PRESERVATION ACT 5 Section 1125. Definitions. 6 1126. State mobile and manufactured home communities preserva- 7 tion program. 8 1127. Financial support to acquire development rights or 9 purchase mobile home and manufactured home parks. 10 § 1125. Definitions. For the purposes of this article: 11 1. "Development rights" means the rights of the fee simple owner to 12 develop, construct on, divide, sell, lease, or otherwise change the 13 property from its current use as a mobile home or manufactured home 14 park, or other affordable housing option as permitted by the land coven- 15 ant at the time of sale. Development rights include the exercise of the 16 owner's rights to sell or grant easements or rights of way, or other 17 rights if by that exercise the use of the land as a mobile home or manu- 18 factured home park is diminished; provided, however, that the term 19 "development rights" shall not include the rights of the owner to sell, 20 lease, or otherwise improve the land to preserve, maintain, operate, or 21 continue the land as a mobile home or manufactured home park or all EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08128-01-5 S. 3835 2 1 other customary rights and privilege of ownership, including the right 2 to privacy. 3 2. "Current property value" means the fair market value of a property 4 that is restricted by an easement or covenant to its use as a mobile 5 home or manufactured home park rather than the highest or best potential 6 use. 7 3. "Mobile home and manufactured home park protection agreement" means 8 preemptive purchase rights or other provisions that are part of or 9 linked to a protection conservation easement or covenant providing the 10 easement holder the preferential right to purchase a protected mobile 11 home and manufactured home park at its current use value in the event 12 the landowner intends to sell such property to a purchaser who does not 13 intend to maintain the property as a mobile home and manufactured home 14 park. 15 § 1126. State mobile and manufactured home communities preservation 16 program. 1. The commissioner, or their authorized designee, shall initi- 17 ate and maintain a state mobile and manufactured home communities pres- 18 ervation program to provide financial and technical assistance, within 19 funds available to counties, municipalities, rural preservation compa- 20 nies, and other non-profit housing organizations for their housing pres- 21 ervation efforts. 22 2. For the purposes of such program, the commissioner shall be author- 23 ized to: 24 (a) develop guidelines for eligibility and an application process for 25 financial assistance; 26 (b) provide technical assistance or contract with the rural housing 27 coalition to provide technical assistance to eligible entities; 28 (c) disseminate information to local governments, mobile home and 29 manufactured home park residents, and housing organizations about the 30 preservation program; and 31 (d) report biennially to the governor and the legislature regarding 32 the activities of the commissioner with regards to the program, includ- 33 ing the types of technical assistance provided, the amount of financial 34 assistance provided, and the number of mobile home parks preserved 35 through the program. 36 § 1127. Financial support to acquire development rights or purchase 37 mobile home and manufactured home parks. Within the limit of funds 38 available in the mortgage insurance fund established pursuant to section 39 twenty-four hundred twenty-nine-b of the public authorities law, the 40 commissioner is hereby authorized to provide financial support to local 41 governments or eligible non-profit housing organizations, such as rural 42 preservation companies, land banks or community land trusts to acquire 43 the development rights or outright purchase of mobile home and manufac- 44 tured home parks. Such funds may be used to administer and assist with 45 the relocation of residents and/or their mobile or manufactured homes to 46 other locations within the state as per regulations promulgated by the 47 commissioner. 48 § 2. Subdivision 1-a of section 2429-b of the public authorities law, 49 as amended by section 13 of chapter 3 of the laws of 2004, is amended to 50 read as follows: 51 1-a. All moneys held in the mortgage insurance fund, except as herein- 52 after provided, shall be used, as required, solely for the payment of 53 the agency's liabilities arising from mortgages insured as provided in 54 section twenty-four hundred twenty-nine-a of this part and from the 55 provision of development corporation credit support as provided in 56 section twenty-four hundred twenty-eight-a of this part and for the S. 3835 3 1 provision of financial support to local governments and eligible non- 2 profit housing organizations pursuant to section eleven hundred twenty- 3 seven of the private housing finance law; provided, however, that no 4 moneys shall be withdrawn from any account at any time in such amount as 5 would reduce the amount of, as applicable, the special account, either 6 pool insurance account or the development corporation credit support 7 account to less than its applicable mortgage insurance fund requirement, 8 except for the purpose of paying such liabilities as the same become due 9 and for the payment of which other moneys of the agency are not avail- 10 able. All payments pursuant to section twenty-four hundred twenty-nine-a 11 of this part, and expenses attributable thereto shall be debited to the 12 special account or the single family pool insurance account or the 13 project pool insurance account or the development corporation credit 14 support account, as appropriate, within the mortgage insurance fund. All 15 other operating expenses of the agency with respect to insurance of 16 mortgages and providing development corporation credit support shall be 17 debited to the special account, the single family pool insurance 18 account, the project pool insurance account or the development corpo- 19 ration credit support account within the mortgage insurance fund, as 20 appropriate. 21 § 3. Subdivision 1-a of section 2429-b of the public authorities law, 22 as amended by section 15 of chapter 3 of the laws of 2004, is amended to 23 read as follows: 24 1-a. All moneys held in the mortgage insurance fund, except as herein- 25 after provided, shall be used, as required, solely for the payment of 26 the agency's liabilities arising from mortgages insured as provided in 27 section twenty-four hundred twenty-nine-a of this part and from the 28 provision of development corporation credit support as provided in 29 section twenty-four hundred twenty-eight-a of this part and for the 30 provision of financial support to local governments and eligible non- 31 profit housing organizations pursuant to section eleven hundred twenty- 32 seven of the private housing finance law; provided, however, that no 33 moneys shall be withdrawn from any account at any time in such amount as 34 would reduce the amount of, as applicable, the special account or the 35 development corporation credit support account to less than its applica- 36 ble mortgage insurance fund requirement, except for the purpose of 37 paying such liabilities as the same become due and for the payment of 38 which other moneys of the agency are not available. All payments pursu- 39 ant to section twenty-four hundred twenty-nine-a of this part, and 40 expenses attributable thereto shall be debited to the special account or 41 the development corporation credit support account within the mortgage 42 insurance fund. All other operating expenses of the agency with respect 43 to insurance of mortgages and providing development corporation credit 44 support shall be debited to the special account or the development 45 corporation credit support account within the mortgage insurance fund, 46 as appropriate. 47 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 48 the amendments to subdivision 1-a of section 2429-b of the public 49 authorities law made by section two of this act shall be subject to the 50 expiration and reversion of such subdivision pursuant to section 19 of 51 chapter 555 of the laws of 1989, as amended, when upon such date the 52 provisions of section three of this act shall take effect.